Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0609

Vacancy on board.

(1) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a vacancy on the board of directors must be filled within a reasonable time by majority vote of the remaining directors.

(2) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, if a vacating director was elected or appointed by a class of members or a district:

(a) The new director must be of that class or district; and

(b) The selection of the director for the unexpired term must be conducted in the same manner as would the selection for that position without a vacancy.

(3) If a member appointed a vacating director, the organic rules may provide for that member to appoint a director to fill the vacancy.

[ 2019 c 37 s 609.]